Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 27 Penalties for Abuse of Persons with Developmental Disabilities

40.1-27-1.
Definitions.

“Abuse” means:

Any assault as defined in chapter 5 of title 11;

Any assault as defined in chapter 37 of title 11;

Any offense under chapter 10 of title 11;

Any conduct that harms or is likely to physically harm the participant except where the conduct is a part of the care and treatment, and in furtherance of the health and safety of the participant; or

Intentionally engaging in a pattern of harassing conduct that is intended to cause psychological harm to the participant; provided, however, nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the prosecution of any violator of this section under any other section.

“Mistreatment” means the inappropriate use of medications, isolation, or use of physical or chemical restraints as punishment, for staff convenience, as a substitute for treatment or care, in conflict with a physician’s order, or in quantities, which inhibit effective care or treatment, which harms or is likely to harm the participant.

“Neglect” means the failure to provide treatment, care, goods, and services necessary to maintain the health and safety of the participant, or the failure to carry out a plan of treatment or care prescribed by the physician of the participant; provided, however, no person shall be considered to be neglected for the sole reason that he or she relies or is being furnished treatment in accordance with the tenets and teachings of a well-recognized church or denomination by a duly accredited practitioner thereof.

“Participant” means any person with developmental disabilities who participates in a program.

“Program” means any day-treatment program, habilitation program, rehabilitation program or other program for persons with developmental disabilities licensed by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals pursuant to §

40.1-24-1

et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 414, § 1.

40.1-27-2.
Duty to report.

Any person within the scope of his or her employment at a program or in his or her professional capacity who has knowledge of, or reasonable cause to believe, that a participant in a program has been abused, mistreated, or neglected shall make, within twenty-four (24) hours or by the end of the next business day, a written report to the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, or his or her designee. The report shall contain:

The name, address, telephone number, occupation, and employer’s address and the phone number of the person reporting;

The name and address of the participant who is believed to be the victim of the abuse, mistreatment, or neglect;

The details, observations, and beliefs concerning the incident(s);

Any statements regarding the incident made by the participant and to whom they were made;

The date, time, and place of the incident;

The name of any individual(s) believed to have knowledge of the incident; and

The name of any individual(s) believed to have been responsible for the incident.

In addition to those persons required to report pursuant to this section, any other person may make a report if that person has reasonable cause to believe that a participant has been abused, mistreated, or neglected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 414, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 32; P.L. 2012, ch. 254, § 6; P.L. 2012, ch. 264, § 6.

40.1-27-3.
Duties of the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

The director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, or his or her designee shall:

Notify the attorney general, or his or her designee, the chair of the program’s human rights committee forthwith upon receipt of an oral or written report made pursuant to §

40.1-27-2

;

Investigate and evaluate, or cause to be investigated and evaluated, the information reported in those reports. The investigation and evaluation shall be made within twenty-four (24) hours if the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals has reasonable cause to believe the participant’s health or safety is in immediate danger of further abuse or neglect and within seven (7) days for all other reports. The investigations shall include a visit to the program; an interview with the participant allegedly abused, mistreated, or neglected; an interview with all witnesses to the alleged incident; a determination of the nature, extent, and cause, or causes, of the injuries; the identity of the person, or persons, responsible therefor; all other pertinent facts; and recommendations to prevent further abuse, mistreatment, or neglect of the participant or other program participants. The determination shall be in writing;

Evaluate the environment in the program named in the report and make a written determination of the risk of physical or emotional injury to any other participants in the same program;

Forward to the attorney general and the chair of the program’s human rights committee, within fifteen (15) days after a case is initially reported pursuant to §

40.1-27-2

, a summary of the findings and recommendations on each case;

If the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals has reasonable cause to believe that a participant had died as a result of abuse, mistreatment, or neglect, immediately report the death to the attorney general and to the office of the medical examiner. The office of the medical examiner shall investigate the report and communicate its preliminary findings, orally within seventy-two (72) hours, and in writing within seven (7) working days to the attorney general and to the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals. The office of the medical examiner shall also communicate its final findings and conclusions, with the basis therefore to the same parties within sixty (60) days;

Promulgate such regulations as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter; and

Maintain a file of the written reports prepared pursuant to this chapter. The written reports shall be confidential, but shall be released to the attorney general, to a court of competent jurisdiction, and upon written request to the participant, his or her counsel, the reporting person or agency, the appropriate review board, or a social worker assigned to the case.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 414, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 254, § 6; P.L. 2012, ch. 264, § 6.

40.1-27-4.
Penalty — Failure to report.

Any person so required to make a report as provided by §

40.1-27-2

and who fails to do so shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Any person who alters or changes without authorization or destroys or renders unavailable a report made by another pursuant to §

40.1-27-2

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Any person who shall attempt, with or without threats or promises of benefit, to induce another to fail to report an incident of abuse, mistreatment, or neglect shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned for more than one year, or both.

Any person who fails to report an incident of abuse, mistreatment, or neglect after another has indicated a reliance on the reporting pursuant to §

40.1-27-2

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned for more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 414, § 1.

40.1-27-5.
Physician’s report of examination — Duty of program.

Whenever a program shall receive a report by a person other than a physician that a participant has been harmed as a result of abuse, neglect, or mistreatment, the program shall have the patient examined by a licensed physician. It shall be mandatory for the physician to make a preliminary report of his or her findings to the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals and to the program within forty-eight (48) hours after his or her examination, and a written report within five (5) days after his or her examination.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 414, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 254, § 6; P.L. 2012, ch. 264, § 6.

40.1-27-6.
Immunity from liability.

Any person who, in good faith, makes an oral or written report pursuant to §

40.1-27-2

, excluding any perpetrator or conspirator of the acts described in §

40.1-27-1

, shall have immunity from any liability, civil or criminal, that might be incurred as a result of having made the report. No program shall discharge, or in any manner discriminate or retaliate against any person who, in good faith, makes a report, testifies, or is about to testify in any proceeding about the abuse, mistreatment, or neglect of participants.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 414, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 144.

40.1-27-7.
Non-retaliation or discrimination.

A program that discharges, discriminates, or retaliates against a person who makes a report, testifies, or is about to testify in any proceeding, shall be liable to the person so discharged, discriminated, or retaliated against, for treble damages, costs, and attorney’s fees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 414, § 1.

40.1-27-8.
Abrogation of privilege.

Any privilege established by chapter 37.3 of title 5, or any professional code relating to the exclusion of confidential communications and/or the competency of witnesses, may not be invoked in any civil or criminal action arising out of a report made pursuant to this chapter or the failure to make a report as required by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 414, § 1.

40.1-27-9.
Notice — Posting provisions.

A notice of the reporting requirements imposed under this chapter, and of the penalty imposed for failure to report, shall be conspicuously posted on each floor of any program required to be licensed under the provisions of §

40.1-24-1

et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 414, § 1.

40.1-27-10.
Penalties for acts of abuse or neglect.

Any person who knowingly abuses, mistreats, or neglects a participant, or commits any acts of abuse, mistreatment, or neglect as those terms are defined by §

40.1-27-1(a)(1)

, (2), (3), or (4), shall be fined not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000) or imprisoned not more than three (3) years, or both.

Any person who commits any act of abuse as the term is defined by §

40.1-27-1(a)(5)

shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 414, § 1.